src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k10x_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hemar
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: hemar
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: hemri
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: hemars
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: hemrar
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: hemrar
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: hemrum
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: hemra
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: hemarin
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: hemarin
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: hemrinum
    hemar+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: hemarsins
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: hemrarnir
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: hemrarnar
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: hemrunum
    hemar+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: hemranna
